Colorado statutes. TITLE 34 Mineral Resources
ARTICLE 32.5
COLORADO LAND RECLAMATION ACT FOR THE
EXTRACTION OF CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS

Section

34-32.5-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Land Reclamation Act for the Extraction of Construction Materials".

Source:

L. 95:

Entire article added, p. 1155, § 1, effective July 1.

34-32.5-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby declares that the extraction of construction materials for government and private enterprise and the reclamation of land affected by such extraction are necessary and proper activities that are compatible. It is the intent of the general assembly to foster and encourage the development of an economically sound and stable extraction materials industry and to encourage the orderly development of the state's natural resources while requiring those persons involved in extraction operations to reclaim land affected so that it may be put to a use beneficial to the people of this state. It is the further intent of the general assembly to conserve natural resources, aid in the protection of wildlife and aquatic resources, establish agricultural, recreational, residential, and industrial sites, and protect and promote the health, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state.

The general assembly further declares that a reclamation regulatory program shall be developed under which the economic costs of reclamation measures shall bear a reasonable relationship to the environmental benefits derived from such measures. When considering the requirements of reclamation measures, the mined land reclamation board or the office of mined land reclamation shall determine the economic reasonableness of the action by evaluating the benefits expected to result from the use of such measures. When considering economic reasonableness, the financial condition of an operator shall not be a factor.

The general assembly further finds and declares that:

It is the policy of this state to recognize that extraction operations are conducted by both government and private entities;

All residents of this state benefit from the reclamation of land;

The funding needed to ensure that reclamation is achieved should be borne equitably by the public and private sectors;

The funding for enforcement and other activities conducted for the benefit of the general public should be supported by the general fund; and

It is the policy of this state to allocate resources adequate to accomplish the purposes of this article.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire article added, p. 1155, § 1, effective July 1.

34-32.5-103. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Affected land" means the surface of an area within the state where a mining operation is being or will be conducted, which surface is disturbed as a result of an operation. Affected lands include, but shall not be limited to, private ways, roads (except those roads excluded by this subsection (1)); land excavations; exploration sites; drill sites or workings; refuse banks or spoil piles; evaporation or settling ponds; work, parking, storage, or waste discharge areas; and areas in which structures, facilities, equipment, machines, tools, or other materials or property that result from or are used in such operations are situated. "Affected land" does not include land that has been reclaimed pursuant to an approved plan or otherwise, as may be approved by the board, or off-site roads that were constructed for purposes unrelated to the proposed operation, were in existence before a permit application was filed with the office, and will not be substantially upgraded to support the operation or off-site groundwater monitoring wells.

(1.5) "Aggrieved" means suffering actual loss or injury, or being exposed to potential loss or injury, to legitimate interests. Such interests include, but are not limited to, business, economic, aesthetic, governmental, recreational, or conservational interests.

"Board" means the mined land reclamation board established by section 34-32-105.

"Construction material" means rock, clay, silt, sand, gravel, limestone, dimension stone, marble, or shale extracted for use in the production of nonmetallic construction products.

"Department" means the department of natural resources.

"Development" means work performed with respect to a construction materials deposit following the exploration required to prove construction materials are in existence in commercial quantities but prior to production activities. Development work includes, but is not limited to, work that must be performed for the purpose of preparing the site for mining, defining further the deposit by drilling or other means, conducting pilot plant operations, constructing roads or ancillary facilities, and other related activities.

"Director" means the director of the division of reclamation, mining, and safety.

"Division" means the division of reclamation, mining, and safety created in section 34-20-103.

"Executive director" means the executive director of the department of natural resources.

"Exploration" means the act of searching for or investigating a construction materials deposit. "Exploration" includes, but is not limited to, sinking shafts, tunneling, drilling core and bore holes, and digging pits, cuts, or other works for the purpose of extracting samples prior to the commencement of development or extraction, and the building of roads, access ways, and other facilities related to such work. "Exploration" does not include:

An activity that causes very little or no surface disturbance, such as airborne surveys and photographs, the use of instruments or devices that are hand-carried or otherwise transported over the surface to make magnetic, radioactive, or other tests and measurements, boundary or claim surveying, location work, or other work that causes no greater land disturbance than is caused by ordinary lawful use of the land by persons not involved in exploration activities; or

Any single activity that results in the disturbance of a single block of land totaling one thousand six hundred square feet or less of the land's surface, not to exceed two such disturbances per acre; except that the cumulative total of such disturbances may not exceed five acres statewide in any exploration operation extending over twenty-four consecutive months.

"Financial warranty" means a warranty of the type described in section 34-32.5-117 (3).

"Life of the mine" means, with respect to a permit granted pursuant to section 34-32.5-110, 34-32.5-111, or 34-32.5-112, a period lasting as long as:

An operator continues to engage in the extraction of construction materials and complies with this article. The life of the mine includes that period of time after the cessation of production that is necessary to complete the reclamation of disturbed lands as required by the board and this article and continues until the board releases the operator, in writing, from further reclamation obligations regarding the affected land, declares the operation terminated, and releases all applicable performance and financial warranties.

Construction material reserves are shown by the operator to remain in the operation and the operator plans to, or does, temporarily cease production for one hundred eighty days or more if such operator files a notice with the board stating the reasons for nonproduction, a plan for the resumption of production, and the measures taken to comply with reclamation and other necessary activities as established by the board to maintain the operation in a nonproducing state. The requirement of a notice of temporary cessation shall not apply to operators who resume operating within one year and have included in their permit applications a statement that the affected lands are to be used for less than one hundred eighty days per year.

Production is resumed within five years after the date production ended, or the operator files a report with the board requesting an extension of the period of temporary cessation of production stating the reasons for the continuation of nonproduction and those factors necessary to, and the plans for, resumption of production. In no case shall a temporary cessation of production be continued for more than ten years without terminating the operation and fully complying with the reclamation requirements of this article.

The board does not take action to declare termination of the life of the mine, which action shall require a sixty-day notice to the operator alleging a violation of paragraph (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection (11), or that inadequate reasons are provided in an operator's report under such paragraphs. In such cases, the board shall provide a reasonable opportunity for the operator to meet with the board to present his or her full case and shall provide reasonable time for such operator to comply with this article.

The operator complies with section 34-32.5-109 (2).

"Mining" means the extraction of construction materials.

"Mining operation" means the development or extraction of a construction material from its natural occurrences on affected land. The term includes, but is not limited to, open mining and surface operation. The term also includes transportation and processing operations on affected land. The term does not include concentrating, milling, evaporation, cleaning, preparation, transportation, and other off-site operations not conducted on affected land.

"Office" means the office of mined land reclamation, created in section 34-32-105.

"Open mining" means the mining of materials by removing the overburden lying above such deposits and mining directly from the deposits thereby exposed. "Open mining" also means mining directly from such deposits where there is no overburden. The term includes but is not limited to such practices as open cut mining, open pit mining, strip mining, quarrying, and dredging.

"Operator" means a person, firm, general or limited partnership, association, or corporation or any department, division, or agency of federal, state, county, or municipal government engaged in or controlling a mining operation.

"Overburden" means earth and other materials that lie above natural minerals and includes earth and other materials that are disturbed from their natural state in the process of extracting construction materials.

"Performance warranty" means a warranty of the type described in section 34-32.5-117 (2).

"Reclamation" means the employment, during and after an operation, of procedures reasonably designed to minimize as much as practicable the disruption from an operation and provide for the establishment of plant cover, stabilization of soil, protection of water resources, or other measures appropriate to the subsequent beneficial use of the affected lands. Reclamation shall be conducted in accordance with the performance standards of this article.

"Refuse" means all waste material directly associated with the cleaning and preparation of substances excavated by an operation.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire article added, p. 1156, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(9) amended, p. 1193, § 1, effective May 25; (1) amended, p. 1285, § 2, effective May 26; (6) and (7) amended, p. 217, § 13, effective August 7.

34-32.5-104. Administration.

In addition to the duties and powers prescribed by the provisions of article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., the office and the board have the full power and authority to carry out and administer the provisions of this article. The office is responsible for the enforcement of reclamation permits only and has no authority or duty to enforce other local, state, or federal agency permits unless otherwise authorized by law.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire article added, p. 1159, § 1, effective July 1.

34-32.5-105. Office of mined land reclamation - mined land reclamation board.

The office and the board created in section 34-32-105 shall administer this article.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire article added, p. 1160, § 1, effective July 1.

34-32.5-106. Duties of board.

In addition to the duties of the board set forth in section 34-32-106 (1), the board shall cause to be published the minutes of its meetings and approve or deny reclamation permits. The board may delegate its responsibility to approve reclamation permits to the director except for regular permits under section 34-32.5-112, where there is a written objection.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire article added, p. 1160, § 1, effective July 1.

34-32.5-107. Powers of board.

The board has the powers set forth in section 34-32-107.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire article added, p. 1160, § 1, effective July 1.

34-32.5-108. Rules.

The board may adopt and promulgate reasonable rules respecting the administration of this article.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire article added, p. 1160, § 1, effective July 1.

34-32.5-109. Reclamation permit required - existing permits.

Before engaging in a new operation, an operator shall first obtain from the board or office a reclamation permit pursuant to section 34-32.5-110, 34-32.5-111, or 34-32.5-112. Notwithstanding this subsection (1), an operator who obtained a permit under section 34-32-110, 34-32-111, or 34-32-112 before July 1, 1995, which permit was valid as of such date, shall continue to operate under such permit, and such permit shall be deemed to be a permit issued under the provisions of this article.

A reclamation permit shall be effective for the life of the stated operation if the operator complies with the conditions of such reclamation permit, this article, and rules promulgated pursuant to this article that are in effect at the time the permit is issued or amended, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2). Nothing in this article shall be construed to abrogate the duty of the operator to comply with other applicable statutes and rules.

This paragraph (b) shall apply to new statutory or regulatory requirements only and shall not serve to reopen the entire permit for technical review or for modification of the postmining land use.

The board may, where good cause is shown, determine that certain regulations not in effect at the time a permit is given should be applicable to such existing permits or to any specified class or category of existing permits, if:

The board or office provides individual notice of the subject matter of the proposed rule in such manner as the board may require and the time, date, and place of the rule-making hearing to operators with existing permits who may be affected by such rule;

The board finds during the rule-making hearing that a failure to apply such proposed rule to existing permits or to an affected class or category of existing permits would pose a reasonable potential for danger to persons or property or the environment; and

The board sets a schedule for existing permit-holding operators to comply with that is reasonable in light of the gravity of the risk to be avoided, any technical considerations, the cost of compliance, and any other relevant factors.

If the board makes a good faith effort to comply with the requirements of sub-subparagraph (B) of subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (b) and complies with the applicable provisions of article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., the adopted rule shall not be deemed invalid on the ground that notice to the affected parties was inadequate.

No governmental office of the state, other than the board, nor any political subdivision of the state shall have the authority to issue a reclamation permit pursuant to this article, to require reclamation standards different than those established in this article, or to require any performance or financial warranty of any kind for mining operations. The operator shall be responsible for assuring that the mining operation and the postmining land use comply with city, town, county, or city and county land use regulations and any master plan for extraction adopted pursuant to section 34-1-304 unless a prior declaration of intent to change or waive the prohibition is obtained by the applicant from the affected political subdivisions. Any mining operator subject to this article shall also be subject to zoning and land use authority and regulation by political subdivisions as provided by law.

Upon receipt of an application for a reclamation permit, the board shall provide notice of such application to all counties in which proposed mining operations are located and to each municipality located within two miles of the area of proposed mining operations.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire article added, p. 1160, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(1) amended, p. 179, § 5, effective April 18.

34-32.5-110. Existing limited impact operations - expedited process.

Any person desiring to conduct mining operations on less than ten acres, prior to commencement of mining, shall file with the office, on a form approved by the board, an application for a permit to conduct mining operations. This application shall contain the following:

The address and telephone number of the general office and the local address or addresses and telephone number of the operator;

The name, address, and telephone number of the owner of the surface of the affected land;

The name of the owner of the subsurface rights of the affected land;

A statement that the operations will be conducted pursuant to the terms and conditions listed on the application and in accordance with the provisions of this article and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this article at the time the permit was approved or amended;

A map showing information sufficient to determine the location of the affected land and existing and proposed roads or access routes to be used in connection with the mining operation;

The approximate size of the affected land;

Information sufficient to describe or identify the type of mining operation proposed and how the operator intends to conduct it;

A statement that the operator has applied for necessary local government approval;

Measures to be taken to reclaim any affected land consistent with the requirements of section 34-32.5-116.

The application required by this subsection (1) shall be sent to the office. If the office denies the application, the applicant may appeal to the board for final determination.

A fee as specified in section 34-32.5-125, and a financial warranty in an amount the board shall determine pursuant to section 34-32.5-117 (4), shall accompany the application and shall be paid by the applicant.

The operator, at any time after the completion of reclamation, may notify the board that the land has been reclaimed. Upon receipt of the notice that the affected land or a portion of it has been reclaimed, the board shall cause the land to be inspected and shall release the performance and financial warranties or appropriate portions thereof within thirty days after the board finds the reclamation to be satisfactory and in accordance with a plan agreed upon by the board and the operator.

Applications for permits made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be processed and final action taken thereon within thirty days of the filing of such application. If action upon the application is not completed within thirty days, the permit shall be deemed approved and shall be promptly issued upon presentation by the applicant of a financial warranty in the amount provided in subsection (2) of this section. The provisions of sections 34-32.5-112, 34-32.5-114, and 34-32.5-115 concerning publication, notice, written objections, petitions, and supporting documents shall, so far as practicable, apply to this section, but the board shall, by regulation, provide simplified and reduced procedures and requirements that are applicable to the thirty-day period. Within the thirty-day period, the board may make a determination on an application as provided in sections 34-32.5-114 and 34-32.5-115.

Any operator conducting an operation under a permit issued under this section who has held the permit for two consecutive years or more and who subsequently desires to expand it to a size in excess of the limitation set forth in subsection (1) of this section may request the conversion of the permit by filing an application for a permit pursuant to subsection (1) of this section or section 34-32.5-112; except that the applicant need not supply information, materials, and other data and undertakings previously supplied, including any additional materials provided to the board during the course of his current operation or resulting from the board's inspections thereof.

Applications for conversion of a permit under this subsection (5) shall be processed and final action taken thereon in accordance with subsection (1) of this section or section 34-32.5-115, as appropriate. If action upon the conversion of the permit is taken in accordance with the time limits of this subsection (5) or section 34-32.5-115, the conversion shall be deemed approved, and a permit for the life of the mine shall be promptly issued upon presentation by the applicant of a financial warranty subject to the limitations provided in subsection (2) of this section or in section 34-32.5-115 (3) or 34-32.5-117 (4).

The provisions of sections 34-32.5-112, 34-32.5-114, and 34-32.5-115 concerning publication, notice, written objections, petitions, and supporting documents shall so far as practicable apply to this section.

The board or office shall not deny the conversion of a permit for any reason other than those set forth in section 34-32.5-115 (4).

If the operator is a department, division, or agency of federal, state, county, or municipal government, the operator may, at its discretion, submit one composite application and annual report for all similarly situated sand, gravel, or quarry operations. Such composite application and annual report shall comply with subsections (1) to (5) of this section. Financial warranty under subsection (2) of this section shall not be required of the operator if it is a unit of county or municipal government or the department of transportation and the operator submits a written guarantee, in lieu of financial warranty, stating that the affected lands will be reclaimed in accordance with the terms of the permit and section 34-32.5-116.

An operator may, within the term of a reclamation permit, apply to the board or to the office for a reclamation permit amendment increasing the acreage to be affected or otherwise revising the reclamation plan. Where applicable, there shall be filed with any application for amendment a map and an application with the same content as required for an original application. The amended application shall be accompanied by a fee as specified in section 34-32.5-125.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire article added, p. 1161, § 1, effective July 1.

34-32.5-111. Special permits - fifteen-calendar-day processing.

An operator of a construction materials extraction operation is subject to this section if the operation is conducted solely to obtain materials for highway, road, utility, or similar construction purposes under a federal, state, county, city, town, or special district contract that requires work to commence within a specified short period of time and will affect no more than thirty acres of land.

An operator of a one-time excavation project that is not performed pursuant to a federal, state, county, city, town, or special district contract is subject to this section if the project generates small quantities of construction materials that are exported from the extraction site and are incidental to the intent of the project. A one-time excavation project that results in excess construction materials and that introduces construction materials into the construction materials market must obtain a permit pursuant to this subsection (1)(b). An operation that qualifies for a permit pursuant to this subsection (1)(b) must be clearly defined, of short duration and scope, affect no more than thirty acres, and not employ material processing activities typically associated with mining operations. Reclamation of all affected lands shall be completed within twelve months after issuance of the permit. An operator possessing a permit issued pursuant to this subsection (1)(b) must convert to the appropriate regular construction materials permit if extraction and export of materials from the site are not completed within twelve months after issuance of a permit pursuant to this subsection (1)(b).

An operator shall apply for a special permit by filing a written application with the board on forms provided by the board for such purpose. An approved special permit shall authorize the operator to engage in the operations described on such permit until the contractual reason for such operations has been completed.

An application shall consist of:

Three application forms;

The application fee specified in section 34-32.5-125;

The financial warranty specified in subsection (5) of this section, unless the office shows good cause that the board should set such financial warranty at a different amount pursuant to section 34-32.5-117; and

Three copies of an accurate map of the affected land, prepared by a professional land surveyor, professional engineer, or other qualified person. Such map shall show information sufficient to determine the location of the affected land and existing and proposed roads or access routes to be used in connection with the operation.

Each application form must include:

The name and address of the general office and the local address or addresses of the operator;

The name and address of the owner of the surface of the affected land;

The name and address of the owner of the subsurface rights of the affected land;

The approximate size of the affected land;

Information sufficient to describe or identify the type of operation proposed and how it will be conducted;

The measures to be taken to comply with applicable provisions of section 34-32.5-116;

The terms of the governmental contract that make a special permit necessary or a clear description of the one-time excavation project described in subsection (1)(b) of this section;

Evidence of any financial warranty required under the governmental contract; and

A statement that the operator has applied for necessary local government approval.

If the board determines that any of the affected land lies within the boundaries of lands described in section 34-32.5-115 (4)(f), such land shall be withdrawn from the operation.

At any time after the completion of reclamation the operator may notify the board that the land or a portion of the land has been reclaimed. Upon receipt of such notice the board shall cause the land to be inspected, and, within sixty days after the board finds the reclamation to be satisfactory and in accordance with the plan agreed upon, the board shall release the performance and financial warranties or the appropriate portions of such warranties.

Special permits shall be denied or issued by the board within fifteen calendar days after the date an application is submitted. Approval shall depend on the application, map, fee, performance warranty, and financial warranty being in compliance with this section. If action on an application is not completed within such fifteen-day period, the permit shall be approved and promptly issued upon presentation by the applicant of a financial warranty in the amount of two thousand five hundred dollars per affected acre or such other amount as may be specified by rule of the board.

A governmental subdivision shall be exempt from subparagraphs (II) and (III) of paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section when such subdivision, acting as an operator, requires a permit solely to mine construction materials for the construction of public roads under a contract with the department of transportation or otherwise.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire article added, p. 1164, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(1), IP(2)(c), and (2)(c)(VII) amended, (SB 18-184), ch. 132, p. 857, § 1, effective August 8.

34-32.5-112. Application for reclamation permit - changes in permits - fees - notice.

To obtain a reclamation permit, an operator shall apply in writing to the board or the office on forms provided by the board. If approved, the reclamation permit shall authorize the operator to engage in the mining operation described in the application upon the affected land for the life of the mine.

Each application shall consist of:

Five copies of the application;

A reclamation plan submitted with each copy of the application;

An accurate map of the affected land submitted with each copy of the application; and

The application fee specified in section 34-32.5-125.

Each application form shall include:

The legal description and area of affected land;

The name of the owner of the surface of the area of affected land;

The name of the owner of the substance to be mined;

The source of the applicant's legal right to enter and initiate a mining operation on the affected land;

The address and telephone number of the general office and the local address and telephone number of the applicant;

Information sufficient to describe or identify the type of mining operation proposed and how the operator intends to conduct such operation;

The size of the area to be worked at any one time;

A timetable estimating the periods required for various stages of the mining operation. The operator shall not be required to meet the timetable, nor shall the timetable be subject to independent review by the board or the office.

The reclamation plan shall include provisions for, or a satisfactory explanation of, all general requirements for the type of reclamation proposed to be implemented by the operator. Reclamation shall be required on all the affected land. The reclamation plan shall include:

A description of the types of reclamation the operator proposes to achieve in the reclamation of the affected land, why each was chosen, and the amount of acreage accorded to each;

A description of how the reclamation plan will be implemented to meet section 34-32.5-116;

A proposed plan or schedule indicating when and how reclamation will be implemented, and such plan or schedule shall not be tied to a specific date but shall be tied to the implementation or completion of different stages of the mining operation;

A map showing the proposed affected lands by all phases of the total scope of the mining operation. Such map shall:

Indicate the expected physical appearance of the area of the affected land, correlated to the proposed timetables required by subparagraph (VIII) of paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section and the plan or schedule required by paragraph (c) of this subsection (2); and

Portray the proposed final land use for each portion of the affected lands.

The map of the affected lands shall:

Be made by a professional land surveyor, professional engineer, or other qualified person;

Identify the area that corresponds with the application;

Show adjoining surface owners of record;

Be made to a scale of not less than one hundred feet to the inch and not more than six hundred sixty feet to the inch;

Show the name and location of all creeks, roads, buildings, oil and gas wells and lines, and power and communication lines within the area of the affected land and within two hundred feet of all boundaries of such area;

Show the total area to be involved in the operation, including the area to be mined and the area of affected land;

Show the topography of the area using contour lines of sufficient detail to portray the direction and rate of slope of the affected land;

Indicate on a map or by a statement the general type, thickness, and distribution of soil over the area in question, including the affected land;

Show the type of vegetation covering the affected land.

The reclamation plan shall also show by statement or map the depth and thickness of the deposit to be mined and the thickness and type of the overburden to be removed, and where overburden is stockpiled, the approximate volumes stockpiled.

The application fee specified in section 34-32.5-125 shall be paid.

Reclamation shall be completed within five years after the date the operator advises the board that each phase of construction material extraction has been completed, as provided in section 34-32.5-116 (4)(q). Such five-year period may be extended by the board upon a finding that additional time is necessary for the completion of the terms of the reclamation plan.

An operator may, within the term of a reclamation permit, apply to the board or the office for a reclamation permit amendment to increase the acreage to be affected or otherwise revise the reclamation plan. An application for the amendment of a reclamation permit shall be reviewed by the board or office in the same manner as an application for a new reclamation permit. The operator shall also submit such supplemental performance and financial warranties as may be required by the board or office for the additional acreage. If the area described in the original application is reduced, then the amount of the financial warranty shall be reduced proportionately. When applicable, the operator shall file with the application for amendment a map and an application with the same content as required for an original application.

An amended application shall be accompanied by the fee specified in section 34-32.5-125.

When an operator files a notice of temporary cessation pursuant to section 34-32.5-103 (11)(b), such notice shall be accompanied by the fee specified in section 34-32.5-125.

The information provided in an application for a reclamation permit that relates to the location, size, or nature of the deposit or information required by subsection (4) of this section and that is marked confidential by the operator shall be protected by the board and the office as confidential information. Such information shall not be a matter of public record in the absence of a written release from the operator or until the mining operation has been terminated. A person who willfully and knowingly violates this subsection (8) or section 34-32.5-113 (3) commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S.

Upon the filing of an application for a reclamation permit, the applicant shall place a copy of such application for public inspection at the office of the board and the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the affected land is located. Such copy shall not include the information exempted by subsection (8) of this section. The copy placed at the office of the county clerk and recorder shall not be recorded but shall be retained until such application has been heard by the board or the office and shall be available for inspection during such period. At the end of such period, the copy may be reclaimed or destroyed by the applicant.

The applicant shall cause notice of the filing of the application to be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the area of the proposed mining operation once a week for four consecutive weeks, commencing not more than ten days after the filing of such application with the board or office. Such notice shall contain information about the:

Identity of the applicant;

Location of the proposed mining operation, if such information does not violate subsection (8) of this section;

Proposed dates of commencement and completion of the operation;

Proposed future use of the affected land;

Location where additional information about the operation may be obtained;

Location and final date for filing objections with the board or the office.

The applicant shall mail a copy of such notice immediately after first publication to all owners of record of the surface and mineral rights of the affected land, the owners of record of all land surface within two hundred feet of the affected lands, and any other owners of record designated by the board who may be affected by the proposed mining operation. Proof of such notice and mailing, such as certified mail with return receipt requested, where possible, shall be provided to the board or the office and shall become part of the application.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire article added, p. 1165, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(8) amended, p. 1546, § 301, effective October 1.

L. 2004:

(9)(c) amended, p. 758, § 1, effective May 13.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.